Arkansas, session 2025, SB593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503(12), concerning the definition of
"pharmacy services administrative organization" used under the Arkansas
Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to read as follows:
(12) "Pharmacy services administrative organization" means an
organization that helps community pharmacies and pharmacy benefits managers
or third-party payers achieve administrative and economic efficiencies,
including contracting, reimbursement, and payment efficiencies;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning definitions used
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" means a standardized agreement entered into by a pharmacy
benefits manager and a network of pharmacies across the United States in
*ANS443*
03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443

SB593
which a pharmacy is, either directly or indirectly, passed through a pharmacy
services administrative organization to agree to certain pricing terms and
conditions if that pharmacy is included within a pharmacy benefits manager
network.
(B) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" includes a nationwide network of pharmacies that have entered
into a contract for national reimbursement rates, terms, and conditions that
are not Arkansas-specific with a pharmacy benefits manager to provide
pharmacist services, including without limitation dispensing medications to a
patient within the pharmacy benefits manager network; and
(17) "Pharmacy services administrative organization contracting"
means an agreement between a pharmacy or pharmacist with a pharmacy benefits
manager and other healthcare payors for a health benefit plan.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 20 — Pharmacy Services Administrative Organization Act

23-99-2001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Pharmacy
Services Administrative Organization Act".

23-99-2002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Health benefit plan" means the same as defined in § 23-92-
503;
(2) "Healthcare payor" means the same as defined in § 23-92-503;
(3) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means the same as defined in §
23-92-503;
(4) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to pharmacies”
means the same as defined in § 23-92-503;
(5) "Pharmacy services administrative organization" means the
same as defined in § 23-92-503;
(6) "Pharmacy services administrative organization contracting"
means the same as defined in § 23-92-503; and
(7) "Pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy
03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443

SB593
contract" means a contractual agreement between a pharmacy services
administrative organization and a pharmacy by which a pharmacy services
administrative organization agrees to negotiate with a pharmacy benefits
manager and other healthcare payors for health benefit plans on behalf of a
pharmacy or pharmacist and to provide other services as stated in the
pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy contract.

23-99-2003. Registration requirements — Application — Fees.
(a)(1) A pharmacy services administrative organization shall not
provide any service in Arkansas without being registered with the State
Insurance Department under this subchapter.
(2)(A) An initial registration fee for a pharmacy services
administrative organization is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(B) The Insurance Commissioner may charge registration
renewal fees as established by rule.
(b)(1) The commissioner shall prescribe the application for
registration to operate in Arkansas as a pharmacy services administrative
organization.
(2) An application for registration as a pharmacy services
administrative organization shall include:
(A) The full business name of the pharmacy services
administrative organization;
(B) The name, business address, phone number, website, and
email address for the primary contact;
(C) The name, business address, phone number, website, and
email address for the contact designated to handle grievances; and
(D) The employer identification number, also known as the
federal employer identification number or the federal tax identification
number.
(3) The commissioner may charge application fees as established
by rule.

23-99-2004. Notice and disclosure requirements.
(a)(1) Beginning on or before March 1, 2026, a pharmacy services
administrative organization shall file with the Insurance Commissioner an
annual report for the preceding calendar year.
03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443

SB593
(2) A report may be requested by the commissioner on renewal of
the registration of the pharmacy services administrative organization if the
information is needed.
(b) The annual report required under subsection (a) of this section
shall:
(1) Include an approximate number of pharmacies that the
pharmacy services administrative organization has a pharmacy services
administrative organization-pharmacy contract with within the state; and
(2) Include the names of:
(A) The pharmacy benefits managers with which the pharmacy
services administrative organization has an agreement; and
(B) The pharmacy benefits managers with which the pharmacy
services administrative organization does not have an agreement.
(c) A pharmacy services administrative organization shall annually
disclose to the State Insurance Department and to pharmacists who or
pharmacies that have an active pharmacy services administrative organization-
pharmacy contract the extent of any ownership or control of the pharmacy
services administrative organization by a parent company, subsidiary, or
other organization that:
(1) Manufactures, sells, or distributes prescription drugs and
is licensed, permitted, or registered as a wholesale distributor in this
state with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy; or
(2) Sells prescription drugs and medicines at retail and is
licensed, permitted, or registered as a retail pharmacy with the board.
(d) A pharmacy services administrative organization shall notify the
department in writing within five (5) business days of any material change in
its ownership or control relating to any company, subsidiary, or other
organization described in subsection (c) of this section.

23-99-2005. Pharmacy services administrative organization contracting
— Requirements.
(a)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall offer and include in any
existing pharmacy services administrative organization a separate Arkansas-
based amendment that complies with the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager
Licensure Act, § 23-92-501 et seq., and other state laws on or before January
1, 2026.
03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443

SB593
(2) A contract provision that states that the pharmacy benefits
manager agrees to comply with applicable laws does not comply with the
requirement in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(3) The Insurance Commissioner may review the pharmacy services
administrative organization agreements that are executed between a pharmacy
and a pharmacy benefits manager if the commissioner has an active
investigation of state laws being violated by the pharmacy benefits manager
related to an executed agreement with a pharmacy services administrative
organization.
(b)(1)(A) A pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy
contract shall include a provision that requires a pharmacy services
administrative organization to provide to a pharmacy a copy of the pharmacy
services administrative organization-pharmacy contract, amendment, payment
schedule, or reimbursement rates within thirty (30) days of the receipt of a
written request from a pharmacy or pharmacist after the execution of a
pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy contract, or an
amendment to a pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy
contract, signed on behalf of the pharmacy if it is a new agreement, new
network, or has a reduction in reimbursement rates compared to the previous
agreement.
(B) The pharmacy services administrative organization may
respond to a written request from a pharmacy or a pharmacist under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section by making the pharmacy services
administrative organization-pharmacy contract document or an amendment or
update to the pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy contract
document available through a pharmacy portal.
(2) Upon written request from a pharmacy or pharmacist for an
existing pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy contract, a
pharmacy services administrative organization-pharmacy contract shall include
a provision that requires a pharmacy services administrative organization to
provide to a pharmacy a copy of the pharmacy services administrative
organization-pharmacy contract, amendment, payment schedule, or reimbursement
rates within five (5) business days of the request.
(c) A pharmacy services administrative organization may file a
complaint with the commissioner against a pharmacy benefits manager or other
healthcare payor for “take it or leave it" terms and conditions in a proposed
03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443

SB593
contract, pharmacy provider manual, or contract amendment that violate
requirements of state law if the pharmacy benefits manager does not actively
respond, communicate, and adjust to the concerns of a pharmacy services
administrative organization, pharmacy, or pharmacist that the proposed
contract or provider manual terms do not follow state law.
(d) The information or data acquired during an examination or review
under subsections (a) and (b) of this section is:
(1) Considered proprietary and confidential under §§ 23-61-
107(a)(4) and 23-61-207; and
(2) Not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-
19-101 et seq.

23-99-2006. Enforcement — Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to administer
and enforce this subchapter.
(b) After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner may
revoke, place on probation, or suspend the registration of a pharmacy
services administrative organization.


















03/31/2025 4:16:26 PM ANS443